Maryland, session 2025, SB1024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
15–106.12.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb1024*

SENATE BILL 1024
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “STATE OR LOCAL PUBLIC SAFETY EMPLOYEE” HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN § 18–601 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING THE STATE OR COUNTY IN WHICH THE CHILD
RESIDES, A FINANCIALLY DEPENDENT CHILD OF A STATE OR LOCAL PUBLIC SAFETY
EMPLOYEE WHO DIES AS A RESULT OF OR IN THE COURSE OF PERFORMANCE OF
DUTIES IS EXEMPT FROM PAYING OUT–OF–STATE OR OUT–OF–COUNTY TUITION AT
A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION.
18–601.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(5) “State or local public safety employee” means a person who is employed
in the State as:
(i) A career or volunteer member of a:
1. Fire department;
2. Ambulance company or squad; or
3. Rescue company or squad;
(ii) A law enforcement officer;
(iii) A correctional officer; or
(iv) A member of the Maryland National Guard who was a resident
of this State at the time of death.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.